test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinyshiwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinyshiwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyshiwaabniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsshiwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsshiwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsshiwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinyshiwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinyshiwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinyshinwibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinyshinwibniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsshiwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsshinwibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshinaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimshiwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshiwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshiwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimshiwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimshiwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimshinwibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimshinwibniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinymishwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymishwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishwaabniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinymishwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinymishniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishniwbaniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsmishniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishniwbaniing
     
